Hawaii statutes.
[§124A-66] Challenges. (a) Members of
a general or special court-martial and the law officer of a general
court-martial may be challenged by the accused or the trial counsel for cause
stated to the court. The court shall determine the relevancy and validity of
challenges for cause, and may not receive a challenge to more than one person
at a time. Challenges by the trial counsel shall ordinarily be presented and
decided before those by the accused are offered.

(b) Each accused and the trial counsel is
entitled to one preemptory challenge, but the law officer may not be challenged
except for cause. [L 1982, c 171, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next